California, session 20252026, AB85.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7282.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:7282.7. (a) Notwithstanding Section 7282.5 or 7284.6, law enforcement officials shall, for an individual described in subdivision (b), cooperate with immigration authorities in any of the following circumstances:(1) Providing information regarding a person’s release date or responding to requests for notification by providing release dates in response to a notification request from immigration authorities.(2) Transferring an individual to immigration authorities in response to a transfer request.(3) Detaining an individual on the basis of a hold request.(b) Law enforcement officials shall cooperate with immigration authorities pursuant to subdivision (a) for an individual who has been convicted of a felony.(c) For the purposes of this section, “immigration authorities” shall have the same meaning as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 7284.4.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.